Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.091

Firm license—Requirements.

(1) The minimum requirements for a firm to receive a license are that the firm:

(a) Designates a managing broker as the "designated broker" who has authority to act for the firm, and provides the director with the name of the owner or owners or any others with a controlling interest in the firm;

(b) Assures that no person with controlling interest in the firm is the subject of a final departmental order, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, suspending or revoking any type of real estate license; and

(c) Does not adopt a name that is the same or similar to currently issued licenses or that implies the real estate firm is a nonprofit or research organization, or is a public bureau or group.

(2) An applicant for a real estate firm's license shall provide the director with:

(a) The firm name and unified business identifier number;

(b) Washington business mailing and street address, contact telephone number, if any, and a mailing and physical address for either the firm's trust account or business records location, or both;

(c) Internet home page site and business email address, if any;

(d) Application fee prescribed by the director; and

(e) Any other information the director may require.

(3) The firm must provide the following to the department for renewal of the firm's license:

(a) Renewal fee;

(b) Notice of any change in controlling interest for the firm; and

(c) Notice of any change in the firm's registration or certificate of authority filed with the secretary of state.

[ 2008 c 23 s 10.]